Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.010

Legislative declaration.

The legislature declares that the public policy of this state is to insure equal opportunity for all of its citizens. The legislature finds that Asian Pacific Americans have unique and special problems. It is the purpose of this chapter to improve the well-being of Asian Pacific Americans by insuring their access to participation in the fields of government, business, education, and other areas. The legislature is particularly concerned with the plight of those Asian Pacific Americans who, for economic, linguistic, or cultural reasons, find themselves disadvantaged or isolated from American society and the benefits of equal opportunity. The legislature aims to help these and all Asian Pacific Americans achieve full equality and inclusion in American society. The legislature further finds that it is necessary to aid Asian Pacific Americans in obtaining governmental services in order to promote the health, safety, and welfare of all the residents of this state. Therefore the legislature deems it necessary to create a commission to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2000 c 236 s 1; 1995 c 67 s 2; 1983 c 119 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2000 c 236: "This act takes effect April 30, 2000." [ 2000 c 236 s 4.]

Effective date—1983 c 119: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 30, 1983." [ 1983 c 119 s 5.]